Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Registration of Voters.

§ 24.2-417.
Persons to be registered.

Each registrar shall register every resident of his county or city who has the qualifications required by the Constitution of Virginia and this title and who applies for registration or transfer of his registration from another county or city in the Commonwealth at the time and in the manner required by law.

Any person, once properly registered, shall remain registered unless his registration is cancelled pursuant to Article 5 (§

24.2-427

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-67, 24-68; 1952, c. 341; 1958, c. 576; 1960, c. 288; 1962, c. 536; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-47, 24.1-48; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 205; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1980, c. 639; 1989, c. 138; 1992, c. 433; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 2000, c. 857.

Cross references.

As to free elections and the right of suffrage, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 6.

As to constitutional prohibition of religious tests and restrictions, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 16.

As to persons excluded from registering and voting, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 1.

For constitutional provision as to registration, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 2.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 857 inserted “or transfer of his registration from another county or city in the Commonwealth” following “registration” in the first undesignated paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 19.

§ 24.2-417.1.
Registration residence requirements; presumptions in certain cases.

In determining the residence as defined in §

24.2-101

and the domicile and place of abode of a participant in the American Conservation and Youth Service Corps provided for by federal law (42 U.S.C. § 12655 et seq.), there shall be a presumption that a participant in the Corps who was domiciled and had a place of abode in Virginia at the time of entering the Corps continues to be domiciled and retains the same place of abode unless the participant expressly states otherwise.

In determining the residence as defined in §

24.2-101

and domicile and place of abode of a military or merchant marine spouse or dependent, there shall be a presumption that a military or merchant marine spouse or dependent who has established physical presence and a place of abode in the Commonwealth shall also have established domicile in the Commonwealth unless the spouse or dependent expressly states otherwise. Once residence is changed, the military or merchant marine spouse or dependent may not revert to any previous residence without re-establishing new physical presence and intent to remain or return.

History.

1995, c. 231; 2006, c. 391.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 391 added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-418.
Application for registration.

Each applicant to register shall provide, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, the information necessary to complete the application to register. Unless physically disabled, he shall sign the application. The application to register shall be only on a form or forms prescribed by the State Board.The form of the application to register shall require the applicant to provide the following information: full name; gender; date of birth; social security number, if any; whether the applicant is presently a United States citizen; address of residence in the precinct; place of last previous registration to vote; and whether the applicant has ever been adjudicated incapacitated and disqualified to vote or convicted of a felony, and if so, whether the applicant’s right to vote has been restored. The form shall contain a statement that whoever votes more than once in any election in the same or different jurisdictions is guilty of a Class 6 felony. Unless directed by the applicant or as permitted in §

24.2-411.2

or

24.2-411.3

, the registration application shall not be pre-populated with information the applicant is required to provide.The form of the application to register shall request that the applicant provide his telephone number and email address, but no application shall be denied for failure to provide such information.

The form shall permit any individual, as follows, or member of his household, to furnish, in addition to his residence street address, a post office box address located within the Commonwealth to be included in lieu of his street address on the lists of registered voters and persons who voted, which are furnished pursuant to §§

24.2-405

and

24.2-406

, on voter registration records made available for public inspection pursuant to §

24.2-444

, or on lists of absentee voter applicants furnished pursuant to §

24.2-706

or

24.2-710

. The voter shall comply with the provisions of §

24.2-424

for any change in the post office box address provided under this subsection.

Any active or retired law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

and in 5 U.S.C. § 8331(20), but excluding officers whose duties relate to detention as defined in 5 U.S.C. § 8331(20);

Any party granted a protective order issued by or under the authority of any court of competent jurisdiction, including but not limited to courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia;

Any party who has furnished a signed written statement by the party that he is in fear for his personal safety from another person who has threatened or stalked him;

Any party participating in the address confidentiality program pursuant to §

2.2-515.2

;

Any active or retired federal or Virginia justice or judge and any active or retired attorney employed by the United States Attorney General or Virginia Attorney General; and

Any person who has been approved to be a foster parent pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

63.2-900

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

If the applicant formerly resided in another state, the general registrar shall send the information contained in the applicant’s registration application to the appropriate voter registration official or other authority of another state where the applicant formerly resided, as prescribed in subdivision 15 of §

24.2-114

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-28, 24-68; 1952, c. 341; 1958, c. 576; 1960, c. 288; 1962, c. 536; 1968, c. 97; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-22, 24.1-48; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 205, 247; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1980, c. 639; 1989, c. 138; 1992, c. 433; 1993, c. 641; 1994, c. 250; 1995, c. 314; 1996, c. 251; 1997, cc. 346, 801; 2001, cc. 612, 626; 2004, c. 184; 2009, cc. 318, 865, 870, 874; 2010, cc. 795, 812; 2012, c. 491; 2013, c. 465; 2015, c. 740; 2016, cc. 630, 633; 2019, c. 342; 2020, cc. 710, 857, 908, 909.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 865, 870 and 874, cl. 3 provides: “That applications printed prior to the effective date of this act may be used until supplies are exhausted.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 612 and 626 are identical, and in the third and fourth paragraphs, substituted “located within the Commonwealth” for “for his residence,” and inserted “or on voter registration records made available for public inspection pursuant to §

24.2-444

” at the end thereof; and substituted “issued by or under the authority of any court of competent jurisdiction, including but not limited to courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia” for “as described in §§ 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, 16.1-279.1 and

18.2-60.3

” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 184 added the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 318, added the subsection A and B designators, redesignated former paragraphs four and five as subdivisions B 2 and B 3, respectively, and added subdivisions B 1 and B 4; in subsection B, substituted “individual, as follows, or member of his household” for “active or retired law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

and in 5 U.S.C. § 8331(20) but excluding officers whose duties relate to detention as defined in paragraphs (A) through (D) of § 8331(20)” and added the last sentence; in subdivision B 2, deleted “to furnish, in addition to his street address, a post office box address located within the Commonwealth to be included in lieu of his street address on the lists of registered voters and persons who voted, which are furnished pursuant to §§

24.2-405

and

24.2-406

, or on voter registration records made available for public inspection pursuant to §

24.2-444

” following “Commonwealth of Virginia”; in subdivision B 3, deleted “to furnish, in addition to his street address, a post office box address located within the Commonwealth to be included in lieu of his street address on the lists of registered voters and persons who voted, that are furnished pursuant to §§

24.2-405

and

24.2-406

, or on voter registration records made available for public inspection pursuant to §

24.2-444

” following “such other person”; and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and added the last sentence of the second paragraph of A and the last sentence of subsection B and subdivisions B 2 and B 3. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 795 added subsection C.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812 inserted “or on lists of absentee voter applicants furnished pursuant to §

24.2-706

or

24.2-710

” and made a related change in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 491 added subdivision B 5 and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 465 added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 reenacted this section without change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 630, in the second paragraph in subsection A, inserted “and disqualified to vote,” substituted “whether” for “under what circumstances” in the first sentence; and substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty” in the second sentence.

The 2016 amendment by c. 633, rewrote former subsection C, which read: “If the applicant formerly resided in another state, the portion of the application to register listing an applicant’s place of last previous registration to vote, or a copy thereof, shall be retained by the general registrar for the city or county where the applicant resides, and the general registrar shall send the original or a copy to the appropriate voter registration official or other authority of another state where the applicant formerly resided.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 342 added subdivision B 6 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020, amendment by c. 710, deleted “accompanied by evidence that he has filed a complaint with a magistrate or law-enforcement official against such other person” from the end of subdivision B 3.

The 2020 amendment by c. 857, added the third paragraph in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 908 and 909 are identical, and substituted “24.2-411.2 or

24.2-411.3

” for “24.2-411.1 or

24.2-411.2

” in subsection A, second paragraph, last sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 16, 20.

§ 24.2-418.1.
Receipt for voter registration applicants.

The state form for the application to register to vote shall contain a receipt that shall be given to the applicant upon his completion of the form. The receipt shall be completed by the person receiving the form from the applicant and shall include the following information: the name of the office, group, or person receiving the registration application; the date that the office, group, or person received the registration application from the applicant; and the phone number of the general registrar or the toll-free phone number of the Department of Elections that the applicant may call to confirm his registration.

The requirement to complete the receipt as provided in subsection A shall not be applicable when a completed form is mailed directly to or completed in the office of a general registrar or the Department.

History.

2008, c. 865; 2015, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 865, cl. 2 provides: “That applications printed prior to the effective date of this act may be used until supplies are exhausted.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “State Board” in subsection A, and substituted “Department” for “State Board of Elections” in subsection B.

§ 24.2-419.
Extended time for certain persons to register by mail.

The registration application of the following persons may accompany an application for an absentee ballot and shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board, on a federal postcard application, or on a federal write-in absentee ballot:

Any member of a uniformed service, as defined in §

24.2-452

, who is on active duty;

Any spouse or dependent residing with a person listed in subdivision 1; and

Any person temporarily residing outside the United States.The registration application from a person listed in subdivisions 1 and 2 may be accepted notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

if they are eligible to be registered and if, by reason of active duty, they are normally absent from the city or county in which they reside.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-68; 1952, c. 341; 1958, c. 576; 1960, c. 288; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-48; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 205; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1980, c. 639; 1989, c. 138; 1992, c. 433; 1993, c. 641; 1995, c. 296; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2004, c. 410; 2012, c. 353.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and rewrote the section catchline, which formerly read: “Absentee application for registration”; rewrote the introductory paragraph, which formerly read: “The following persons are entitled to register by absentee application if they are eligible to be registered and if, by reason of active duty or employment, they are normally absent from the city or county in which they reside”; inserted “and” at the end of subdivision 2; deleted former subdivision 3, which read: “Any person who resides temporarily outside of the United States by virtue of his employment”; redesignated former subdivision 4 as present subdivision 3, and substituted “1 or 2” for “1, 2, and 3 of this section” at the end thereof; and deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, the registration application from a person listed in subdivision 1 or 2 of the preceding paragraph, or his spouse or dependent, may accompany an application for an absentee ballot and shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, in the introductory paragraph, deleted “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

” at the beginning and added “or on a Federal Post Card Application” at the end; added subdivision 4 and the last paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 substituted “State Board, on a federal postcard application, or on a federal write-in absentee ballot” for “State Board or on a Federal Post Card Application” at the end of the introductory paragraph; substituted “service, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “service of the United States, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff-6 (7)” in subdivision 1; deleted former subdivision 2, which read: “Any member of the merchant marine of the United States” and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; and in the concluding paragraph, substituted “subdivisions 1 and 2 may” for “subdivisions 1, 2 and 3 of this section may.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 19.

§ 24.2-420.
Repealed by Acts 1995, c. 296.

§ 24.2-420.1.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Extended time for certain persons to register in person.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, the following persons shall be entitled to register in person up to and including the day of the election:

Any member of a uniformed service of the United States, as defined in §

24.2-452

, who is on active duty;

Any person who resides temporarily outside of the United States; and

Any spouse or dependent residing with a person listed in subdivision 1 or 2 of this subsection.The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those persons who are otherwise qualified to register and who, by reason of such active duty or temporary overseas residency, either (i) are normally absent from the city or county in which they reside or (ii) have been absent from such city or county and returned to reside there during the twenty-eight days immediately preceding the election.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, any person who was on active duty as a member of a uniformed service as defined in §

24.2-452

and discharged from the uniformed service during the sixty days immediately preceding the election, and his spouse or dependent, shall be entitled to register, if otherwise qualified, in person up to and including the day of the election.

The Department shall prescribe procedures for the addition of persons registered under this section to the lists of registered voters.

History.

1995, c. 296; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2015, c. 740.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until October 1,2022. For the version of this section effective October 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered
§

24.2-420.1

.

Cross references.

As to cancellation of registration by voter or for persons known to be deceased or disqualified to vote, see §

24.2-427

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and added “in person” to the end of the section catchline; deleted “by virtue of his employment” following “United States” in subdivision A 3; and substituted “temporary overseas residence” for “employment” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “§

24.2-452

” for “52 U.S.C.§ 20310(7)” in subdivision A 1, deleted subdivision A 2, which read: “Any member of the merchant marine of the United States,” redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and in subdivision A 3, substituted “subdivision 1 or 2” for “subdivision 1, 2 or 3”; substituted “as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “of the United States” in subsection B; and substituted “Department” for “State Board” in subsection C.

§ 24.2-420.1.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Extended time for persons to register in person.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, any person who is qualified to register to vote shall be entitled to register in person up to and including the day of the election at the office of the general registrar in the locality in which such person resides or at the polling place for the precinct in which such person resides.

The Department shall prescribe procedures for the addition of persons registered under this section to the lists of registered voters.

History.

1995, c. 296; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2015, c. 740; 2020, c. 1153.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective October 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective until October 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

24.2-420.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1153, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1153, effective October 1, 2022, rewrote subsections A and B, which read “A. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, the following persons shall be entitled to register in person up to and including the day of the election: 1. Any member of a uniformed service of the United States, as defined in §

24.2-452

, who is on active duty; 2. Any person who resides temporarily outside of the United States; and 3. Any spouse or dependent residing with a person listed in subdivision 1 or 2 of this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those persons who are otherwise qualified to register and who, by reason of such active duty or temporary overseas residency, either (i) are normally absent from the city or county in which they reside or (ii) have been absent from such city or county and returned to reside there during the twenty-eight days immediately preceding the election. B. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-416

, any person who was on active duty as a member of a uniformed service as defined in §

24.2-452

and discharged from the uniformed service during the sixty days immediately preceding the election, and his spouse or dependent, shall be entitled to register, if otherwise qualified, in person up to and including the day of the election.”

§ 24.2-421.
Repealed by Acts 1997, cc. 523 and 539.

§ 24.2-422.
Appeal of person denied registration.

Within five days after the denial of an application to register, the general registrar shall notify the applicant of the denial. Notice shall be given in writing and by email or telephone if such information was provided by the applicant.The general registrar shall send a new application for registration to the applicant with the form prescribed in subsection B. If the applicant provided his email address on the application for registration, the general registrar may send information to that email address regarding online voter registration. The general registrar shall advise the applicant that he may complete and submit the new application, in lieu of filing an appeal, if the reason stated for denial is that the applicant has failed to sign the application or failed to provide a required item of information on the application. If the general registrar is able to reach the applicant by telephone, corrections may be made by the applicant by telephone. Any applicant who returns a second application and whose second application is denied shall have the right to appeal provided in subsection B.

A person denied registration shall have the right to appeal, without payment of writ tax or giving security for costs, to the circuit court of the county or city in which he offers to register by filing with the clerk of the court, within 10 days of being notified of the denial, a petition in writing to have his right to register determined.The petitioner may file his petition by completing and filing a form which shall be prescribed by the State Board and which shall be used by the general registrar to notify an applicant of the denial of his application to register and of the reasons for the denial. The form shall (i) state that an applicant denied registration has the right to appeal to the circuit court of the county or city in which he offers to register, (ii) give the name and address of the clerk of the circuit court for such county or city (to be supplied by the general registrar), (iii) state that a filing fee of $10 must be paid when filing the petition, (iv) contain a statement by which the applicant may indicate his desire to petition the court to have his right to register determined, and (v) provide space for the applicant to state the facts in support of his right to register.On the filing of a petition to have the right to register determined, the clerk of the court shall immediately bring the matter to the attention of the chief judge of the court for the scheduling of a hearing on the petition. The matter shall be heard and determined on the face of the petition, the answer made in writing by the general registrar, and any evidence introduced as part of the proceedings. The proceedings shall take precedence over all other business of the court and shall be heard as soon as possible.On the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall immediately give notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth for his county or city, who shall appear and defend against the petition on behalf of the Commonwealth.Judgment in favor of the petitioner shall entitle him to registration. From a judgment rendered against the petitioner, an appeal shall lie to the Court of Appeals.

The provisions of §

24.2-416

, pertaining to the closing of registration records in advance of an election, shall apply to any application submitted pursuant to subsection A or B following a denial of registration.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-112; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-67; 1974, c. 428; 1985, c. 351; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 114; 2001, c. 627; 2019, c. 341; 2020, c. 857; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Cross references.

For constitutional requirement that General Assembly provide for appeal by persons denied registration, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 4.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 627, in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “in subsection A” in two places, and added subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 341 substituted “10 days of being notified of the” for “ten days after the” in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 857, added subsection A and redesignated its existing provisions as subsection B; deleted the existing provisions of subsection B, which read, “The general registrar shall send a new application for registration to the applicant with the form prescribed in subsection A. The general registrar shall advise the applicant that he may complete and return the new application, in lieu of filing an appeal, if the reason stated for denial is that the applicant has failed to sign the application or failed to provide a required item of information on the application. Any applicant who returns a second application and whose second application is denied shall have the right to appeal provided in subsection A” and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia” in subsection B in the last paragraph.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 11 Trials at Common Law. § 11.01 Dockets. Bryson.

§ 24.2-423.
Notice of change of name of registered voter.

Whenever a registered voter changes his legal name, either by marriage, divorce, order of court, or otherwise, the voter shall promptly notify the general registrar of the jurisdiction where he is registered. Such notice may be made in writing or on a form approved by the State Board of Elections, which may be electronic. The notice in writing may be provided by mail or by facsimile and shall be signed by the voter unless he is physically unable to sign, in which case his own mark acknowledged by a witness shall be sufficient signature. Notice may be provided by electronic means as authorized by the State Board and signed by the voter in a manner consistent with the provisions of §

24.2-416.7

and the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.). The general registrar shall enter the new name on the registration records and issue the voter a new voter registration card.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-81; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-51; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2013, c. 520.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “Whenever a registered voter changes his name, either by marriage or order of court, or otherwise, the voter shall notify in writing the general registrar of the jurisdiction where he is registered.
The general registrar shall enter the new name on the registration records and issue the voter a new voter registration card.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 520, in the fourth sentence, deleted “The State Board is authorized to conduct a pilot program, under which electronic” at the beginning
and made a capitalization change, deleted “electronic mail or such other” following “provided by,” substituted “authorized” for “may be permitted,” and inserted “the provisions of §

24.2-416.7

and.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1603 Petition to Change Name; No. 5-1604 Petition for Name Change — Adults Only.

§ 24.2-424.
Change of registered voter’s address within the Commonwealth; pilot project.

Whenever a registered voter changes his place of residence within the Commonwealth, he shall promptly notify any general registrar of the address of his new residence. Such notice may be made in person, in writing, by return of the voter registration card noting the new address, or on a form approved by the State Board of Elections, which may be electronic. The notice in writing may be provided by mail or by facsimile and shall be signed by the voter unless he is physically unable to sign, in which case his own mark acknowledged by a witness shall be sufficient signature. Notice may be provided by electronic means as authorized by the State Board and signed by the voter in a manner consistent with the provisions of §

24.2-416.7

and the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.). The fact that a voter provides an address on a candidate or referendum petition that differs from the address for the voter on the voter registration system shall not be sufficient notice to change the voter’s registration address. Any statements made by any voter applying for transfer are subject to felony penalties for making a false statement pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

If the voter has moved within the same county or city, on receipt of the notification, the general registrar for that county or city shall (i) enter the new address on the registration record; (ii) if satisfied that the registered voter has moved into another precinct within the same county or city, transfer the registration of the voter to that precinct; and (iii) send the voter confirmation documents. This transfer may be entered in the registration records at any time the registration records are not closed pursuant to §

24.2-416

.

Any request for transfer or change of address within the Commonwealth delivered to any registrar shall be forwarded to the general registrar for the city or county in the Commonwealth where the voter now resides. When forwarding said notice, or upon request from the registrar for the county or city where the voter now resides, the registrar for the county or city where the voter formerly resided shall forward the original application for registration to the registrar for the voter’s new locality.

Upon receipt of the voter’s original registration application, and notice as specified in subsection A of this section indicating the voter’s current residence, the registrar for the county or city in which the voter currently resides shall: (i) enter the new address on the registration record; (ii) if satisfied that the registered voter has moved into a precinct within that county or city, transfer the registration of the voter to that precinct; (iii) send the voter confirmation documents; and (iv) through the Virginia voter registration system, notify the registrar of the locality where the voter formerly resided that the registration has been transferred. This transfer may be entered in the registration records at any time the registration records are not closed pursuant to §

24.2-416

.

If the original registration application is no longer available to the registrar in the city or county where the voter formerly resided, either of the following shall be sent to and accepted by the registrar in the city or county where the voter now resides in lieu of such application: (i) an unsigned voter card (or conversion card) used as the voter record upon the creation of the statewide voter registration system or (ii) a replacement record provided by the Department to replace damaged files in the registrar’s office. If no other record is available, then the registrar of the voter’s former locality shall provide written notification to the registrar of the locality in which the voter now resides that none of the required documents are available. In this instance only, the registrar of the locality in which the voter now resides shall copy the voter’s record from the Virginia voter registration system and use that record in lieu of the original voter registration application. Any complete voter registration application on a form previously authorized for use in Virginia shall be valid for the purposes of continuing or transferring a voter’s registration within the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-85; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-52; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 247; 1977, c. 490; 1993, c. 641; 2000, c. 857; 2001, cc. 615, 625; 2002, c. 279; 2003, c. 1015; 2013, cc. 520, 684; 2015, c. 740.

Cross references.

For constitutional requirement that General Assembly provide for transfer of voters, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 4.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 857, substituted “Commonwealth” for “same county or city” in the catchline, and inserted the subsection A designation; in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “Commonwealth” for “same county or city”, and substituted “any” for “in writing the”; added the second, third, and fourth sentences in subsection A; inserted the subsection B designation; redesignated the former second and third sentences of the section as subsection B; added “If the voter has moved within the same county or city” at the beginning of subsection B, and inserted “for that county or city” preceding “shall (i)” in the first sentence of subsection B; and added subsections C and D.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 615 inserted “in writing may be provided by mail or by facsimile and” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2001 amendment by c. 625 added the fourth sentence in subsection A.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 279, in subsection A, added “which may be electronic” at the end of the second sentence and inserted the present fourth sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015 added subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 520, in subsection A, in the fourth sentence, deleted “The State Board is authorized to conduct a pilot program, under which electronic” at the beginning and made a capitalization change, deleted “electronic mail or such other” preceding “electronic means,” substituted “authorized” for “may be permitted,” and inserted “the provisions of §

24.2-416.7

and”; and deleted the quotes around “conversion card” in subsection E, in clause (i).

The 2013 amendment by c. 684, in subsection A, in the next-to-last sentence, deleted “deemed” before “sufficient notice” and “in and of itself” before “to change”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “send the voter confirmation documents” for “issue the voter a new voter registration card” in subdivisions B (iii) and D (iii); and substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the first sentence of subsection E.

§ 24.2-425.
Repealed by Acts 2000, c. 857, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-425

, relating to transfer of registered voter to another county or city, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 24-86, 24-87; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-53; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1978, c. 778; 1982, c. 650; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73.